Utah statutes.
22-3-103.   Fiduciary duties -- General principles.
(1)  In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and
income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of Parts 2 and 3, a
fiduciary:
(a)  shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the
trust or the will, even if there is a different provision in this chapter;
(b)  may administer a trust or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power
of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust or the
will, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a
result required or permitted by this chapter;
(c)  shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this chapter if the
terms of the trust or the will do not contain a different provision or do not
give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration; and
(d)  shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent
that the terms of the trust and this chapter do not provide a rule for
allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.
(2)  In exercising the power to adjust under Subsection 22-3-104(1) or a
discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of
this chapter, whether granted by the terms of a trust, a will, or this
chapter, a fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on
what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent
that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the
fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries.  A
determination in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be fair and
reasonable to all of the beneficiaries.
